Hawaii statutes.
§428-1007 Cancellation of authority.
(a) A foreign limited liability company may cancel its authority to transact
business in this State by obtaining a certificate of cancellation.
Cancellation does not terminate the authority of the director to accept service
of process on the company for claims for relief arising out of the transactions
of business in this State. In order to obtain a certificate of cancellation,
the foreign limited liability company shall deliver to the director for filing
an application for cancellation, which shall set forth:

(1) The name and jurisdiction of formation or
organization of the foreign limited liability company;

(2) A statement that the foreign limited liability
company is not transacting business in this State;

(3) A statement that the foreign limited liability
company surrenders its authority to transact business in this State;

(4) A statement that the foreign limited liability
company revokes the authority of its agent for service of process in this State
and consents that the service of process for any claim for relief arising out
of the transactions of business in this State may be made on such foreign
limited liability company by service upon the director;

(5) The address to which a person may mail a copy of
any process against the foreign limited liability company;

(6) The dates the notice of cancellation was
published pursuant to subsection (b) and the name of the newspaper publishing
the notice, or a statement that publication was not made; and

(7) A statement that all taxes, debts, obligations,
and liabilities of the foreign limited liability company in this State have
been paid and discharged or that adequate provision has been made therefor.

(b) A foreign limited liability company
intending to cancel its authority to transact business in this State may
publish notice of its cancellation and request persons having claims against
the company to present them in accordance with the notice. The notice shall:

(1) Be published at least once in each of four successive
weeks (four publications) in a daily or weekly publication of statewide
circulation or in separate daily or weekly publications whose combined
circulation is statewide; and

(2) Describe the information required to be contained
in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim may be sent.

(c) After the filing of the application for
cancellation, the director shall issue a certificate of cancellation which
shall be effective as of the date of the filing of the application for
cancellation, and the authority of the foreign limited liability company to
transact business in this State shall cease. [L 1996, c 92, pt of §1; am L
1998, c 11, §21; am L 2000, c 219, §81; am L 2001, c 129, §102]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next